Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
In General
§ 43-33-28.
Issuance of leased housing revenue refunding bonds by certain housing authorities.

Any housing authority organized under Sections 43-33-1 through 43-33-53 which is composed of ten (10) counties in the northeastern part of the State of Mississippi with counties bordering both the State of Tennessee and the State of Alabama and more specifically domiciled in a county where U. S. Highway 45 and U. S. Highway 72 intersect is hereby authorized and empowered to issue negotiable leased housing revenue refunding bonds in a principal amount not exceeding nineteen million dollars ($19,000,000.00) for the purpose of refunding its outstanding sixteen million dollars ($16,000,000.00) principal amount housing bonds, Series 1970, dated as of December 1, 1970, (“the Series 1970 bonds”), including interest thereon and applicable redemption premiums and paying other obligations and expenses of the authority necessary for the completion of one thousand thirty-three (1,033) low-rent dwelling units proposed to be financed from the proceeds of the Series 1970 bonds. The proceeds of any such refunding bonds shall be deposited with the trustee named in the bonds to be refunded, and pending the application thereof to the payment of the principal of and interest on and redemption premium on the bonds to be refunded shall be invested and reinvested only in (a) obligations of, or obligations the principal of and interest on which is guaranteed by, the United States of America; (b) obligations of any agency or instrumentality of the United States of America; or (c) in certificates of deposit issued by either a state or national bank which is a qualified depository of the State of Mississippi bearing interest at any rate which may be agreed upon, which certificates of deposit shall be secured by a pledge of any of the obligations authorized by law for the securing of public deposits and having at all times an aggregate market value, exclusive of accrued interest, equal at least to the principal amount of the certificates so secured.

All interest or other increment received on or on account of all such investments shall be deposited in and become a part of the fund held by the trustee for the payment and redemption of the bonds to be refunded. Provided that the trustee may, after making due provisions for the payment and redemption of the Series 1970 bonds, disburse any portion of the principal proceeds in excess of sixteen million dollars ($16,000,000.00) for payment of obligations and expenses of the authority necessary for the completion of the low-rent dwelling units and for payment of expenses incurred by the issuance of the bonds herein authorized; provided, that attorney’s fees shall not exceed those set forth in Section 57-1-31, Mississippi Code of 1972.

The bonds herein authorized shall be authorized by a resolution adopted by the board of commissioners of the authority; may bear such date; may be of such denomination; may mature at such time or times, not exceeding twenty (20) years after the date thereof; and may be redeemable on such terms; all as may be determined by such resolution and in compliance with the provisions of Section 43-33-25. Such bonds shall not bear a greater overall maximum interest rate to maturity than six percent (6%) per annum. No bond shall bear more than one (1) rate of interest; each bond shall bear interest from its date to its stated maturity date at the interest rate specified in the bid; all bonds of the same maturity shall bear the same rate of interest from date to maturity; all interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any such bond may be for any period not exceeding one (1) year.

No interest payment shall be evidenced by more than one (1) coupon and neither cancelled nor supplemental coupons shall be permitted; the lowest interest rate specified for any bonds issued shall not be less than seventy percent (70%) of the highest interest rate specified for the same bond issue. The interest rate of any one (1) interest coupon shall not exceed seven percent (7%).

Each interest rate specified in any bid must be in multiples of one-eighth of one percent (1/8 of 1%) or in multiples of one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%), and a zero rate of interest cannot be named. No bonds shall be issued and sold under the provisions of this section for less than par and accrued interest.

The bonds herein authorized shall be payable solely from certain revenues derived by the authority in connection with the low-rent housing project for which the Series 1970 bonds were issued, including annual contributions from the United States of America, income from notes and mortgages purchased from the proceeds of the Series 1970 bonds and the bonds herein authorized, and surplus money available after the Series 1970 bonds shall have been retired from the trust created pursuant to this section and may be secured by a trust indenture. The bonds herein authorized shall not be obligations of the State of Mississippi or of any county or municipality therein, but shall be solely the obligations of the authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 445, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 1973).

§ 43-33-29.
Remedies of an obligee of authority.

An obligee of an authority shall have the right in addition to all other rights which may be conferred on such obligee, subject only to any contractual restrictions binding upon such obligee:

By mandamus, suit, action or proceeding at law or in equity to compel said authority and the commissioners, officers, agents or employees thereof to perform each and every term, provision and covenant contained in any contract of said authority with or for the benefit of such obligee, and to require the carrying out of any or all such covenants and agreements of said authority and the fulfillment of all duties imposed upon said authority by this article.

By suit, action or proceeding in equity, to enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful, or the violation of any of the rights of such obligee of said authority.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7309; Laws, 1938, ch. 338, § 15.

§ 43-33-31.
Additional remedies conferable by authority.

An authority shall have power by its resolution, trust indenture, mortgage, lease or other contract to confer upon any obligee holding or representing a specified amount in bonds, or holding a lease, the right (in addition to all rights that may otherwise be conferred), upon the happening of an event of default as defined in such resolution or instrument, by suit, action, or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction:

To cause possession of any housing project or any part thereof to be surrendered to any such obligee.

To obtain the appointment of a receiver of any housing project of said authority or any part thereof and of the rents and profits therefrom. If such receiver be appointed, he may enter and take possession of such housing project or any part thereof and operate and maintain same, and collect and receive all fees, rents, revenues, or other charges thereafter arising therefrom, and shall keep such moneys in a separate account or accounts and apply the same in accordance with the obligations of said authority as the court shall direct.

To require said authority and the commissioners thereof to account as if it and they were the trustees of an express trust.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7310; Laws, 1938, ch. 338, § 16.

§ 43-33-33.
Exemption of property from execution sale.

All real property of an authority shall be exempt from levy and sale by virtue of an execution, and no execution or other judicial process shall issue against the same nor shall any judgment against an authority be a charge or lien upon its real property. However, the provisions of this section shall not apply to or limit the right of obligees to foreclose or otherwise enforce any mortgage of an authority or the right of obligees to pursue any remedies for the enforcement of any pledge or lien given by an authority on its rents, fees or revenues.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7311; Laws, 1938, ch. 338, § 17.

§ 43-33-35.
Aid from federal government.

In addition to the powers conferred upon an authority by other provisions of this article, an authority is empowered to borrow money or accept contributions, grants or other financial assistance from the federal government for or in aid of any housing project within its area of operation, to take over or lease or manage any housing project or undertaking constructed or owned by the federal government, and to these ends, to comply with such conditions and enter into such mortgages, trust indentures, leases or agreements as may be necessary, convenient or desirable. It is the purpose and intent of this article to authorize every authority to do any and all things necessary or desirable to secure the financial aid or cooperation of the federal government in the undertaking, construction, maintenance or operation of any housing project by such authority.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7312; Laws, 1938, ch. 338, § 18.

§ 43-33-37.
Tax exemption and payments in lieu of taxes.

The property of an authority is declared to be public property used for essential public and governmental purposes and such property of an authority shall be exempt from all taxes and special assessments levied by the city, the county, the state or any political subdivision thereof. However, in lieu of such taxes an authority may make annual payments in lieu of taxes and special assessments to the city or county or any such political subdivision for improvements, services and facilities furnished by such city, county or political subdivision for the benefit of a housing project. Each such annual payment in lieu of taxes shall be made after the end of the fiscal year established for a housing project, and may be in an amount not exceeding ten percent (10%) of the aggregate shelter rent charged by the local authority in respect to such project during such fiscal year. However, upon failure of the local authority to make any such payment in lieu of taxes, no lien against any project or assets of the local authority shall attach.

No payment for any year shall be in excess of the amount of the real property taxes which would have been paid for such year if the project were not exempt from taxation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7313; Laws, 1938, ch. 338, § 19; Laws, 1948, ch. 451, § 1; Laws, 1950, ch. 514; Laws, 1958, ch. 551; Laws, 1974, ch. 480, eff from and after July 1, 1974.

§ 43-33-39.
Housing bonds to be legal investments, legal security and negotiable.

The state and all public officers, municipal corporations, political subdivisions, and public bodies, all banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks and institutions, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business, all insurance companies, insurance associations and other persons carrying on an insurance business and all executors, administrators, guardians, trustees and other fiduciaries may legally invest any sinking funds, moneys or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds or other obligations issued by a housing authority pursuant to the Housing Authorities Law, or any law amendatory or supplemental thereto, of the State of Mississippi or issued by any public housing authority or agency in the United States, when such bonds or other obligations are secured by a pledge of annual contributions to be paid by the United States government or any agency thereof, and such bonds and other obligations shall be authorized security for all public deposits and shall be fully negotiable in this state; it being the purpose of this article to authorize any persons, firms, corporations, associations, political subdivisions, bodies, and officers, public or private, to use any funds owned or controlled by them, including (but not limited to) sinking, insurance, investment, retirement, compensation, pension and trust funds, and funds held on deposit, for the purchase of any such bonds or other obligations, and that any such bonds or other obligations shall be authorized security for all public deposits and shall be fully negotiable in this state. However, nothing contained in this article with regard to legal investments shall be construed as relieving any person, firm or corporation from any duty of exercising reasonable care in selecting securities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7314; Laws, 1938, ch. 338, § 20; Laws, 1942, ch. 233, § 3.

§ 43-33-41.
Reports.

At least once a year, an authority shall file with the clerk a report of its activities for the preceding year, and shall make recommendations with reference to such additional legislation or other action as it deems necessary in order to carry out the purposes of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7315; Laws, 1938, ch. 338, § 21.

§ 43-33-43.
Cooperation in undertaking housing projects.

For the purpose of aiding and cooperating in the planning, undertaking, construction or operation of housing projects located within the area in which it is authorized to act, any state public body may upon such terms, with or without consideration, as it may determine:

Dedicate, sell, convey or lease any of its interest in any property, or grant easement, licenses or any other rights or privileges therein, in accordance with the provisions of Section 29-1-1, to a housing authority or the federal government;

Cause parks, playgrounds, recreational, community, educational, water, sewer or drainage facilities, or any other works which it is otherwise empowered to undertake, to be furnished adjacent to or in connection with housing projects;

Furnish, dedicate, close, pave, install, grade, regrade, plan or replan streets, roads, roadways, alleys, sidewalks or other places which it is otherwise empowered to undertake;

Plan or replan, zone or rezone any part of such state public body; make exceptions from building regulations and ordinances; any city, town or village also may change its map;

Cause services to be furnished to the housing authority of the character which the state public body is otherwise empowered to furnish;

Enter into agreements with respect to the exercise by the state public body of its powers relating to the repair, elimination or closing of unsafe, unsanitary or unfit dwellings;

Purchase any of the bonds of a housing authority or legally invest in these bonds any funds belonging to or within the control of the state public body, and exercise all of the rights of any holder of these bonds;

Do all things necessary or convenient to aid and cooperate in the planning, undertaking, construction or operation of housing projects;

Incur the entire expense of any public improvements made by the state public body in exercising the powers granted in this article; and

Enter into agreements (which may extend over any period, notwithstanding any provision or rule of law to the contrary), with a housing authority respecting action to be taken by the state public body pursuant to any of the powers granted by this article. Any law or statute to the contrary notwithstanding, any sale, conveyance, lease or agreement provided for in this section may be made by a state public body without appraisal, public notice, advertisement of public building.

With respect to any housing project which a housing authority has acquired or taken over from the federal government and which the housing authority by resolution has found and declared to have been constructed in a manner that will promote the public interest and afford necessary safety, sanitation and other protection, no state public body shall require any changes to be made in the housing project or the manner of its construction or take any other action relating to its construction.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7316; Laws, 1938, ch. 338, § 22; Laws, 1993, ch. 615, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 43-33-45.
Agreements as to payments by housing authority.

In connection with any housing project located wholly or partly within the area in which it is authorized to act, any state public body may agree with a housing authority or the federal government that a certain sum, or that no sum, shall be paid by the authority in lieu of taxes for any year or period of years.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7317; Laws, 1938, ch. 338, § 23; Laws, 1948, ch. 451, § 2.

§ 43-33-47.
Advances to housing authority.

Any city, town, village or county located in whole or in part within the area of operation of a housing authority shall have the power from time to time to lend or donate money to such authority or to agree to take such action. Such housing authority, when it has money available therefor, shall make reimbursements for all such loans made to it.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7318; Laws, 1938, ch. 338, § 24.

§ 43-33-49.
Procedure for exercising powers.

The exercise by a state public body of the powers herein granted may be authorized by a resolution of the governing body of such state public body adopted by a majority of the members of its governing body present at a meeting of said governing body, which resolution may be adopted at the meeting at which such resolution is introduced. Such a resolution or resolutions shall take effect immediately and need not be laid over or published or posted.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7319; Laws, 1938, ch. 338, § 25.

§ 43-33-51.
Supplemental nature of article.

The powers conferred by this article shall be in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7320; Laws, 1938, ch. 338, § 26.

§ 43-33-53.
Article controlling.

In so far as the provisions of this article are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, the provisions of this article shall be controlling.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7322; Laws, 1938, ch. 338, § 28.